Washington statutes.
RCW 18.300.005

Finding.

The legislature finds and declares that the practices of body piercing, tattooing, and other forms of body art involve an invasive procedure with the use of needles, sharps, instruments, and jewelry. These practices may be dangerous when improper sterilization techniques are used, presenting a risk of infecting the client with blood-borne pathogens including, but not limited to, HIV, hepatitis B, and hepatitis C. It is in the interests of the public health, safety, and welfare to establish requirements in the commercial practice of these activities in this state.

[ 2009 c 412 s 1.]